Maine, session 132, LD1139.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§2, ¶J, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. MMMM,
§2, is further amended to read:
J. Any balance remaining in the Office of Behavioral Health program, General Fund
account at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for use by this program in
the next fiscal year; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§2, ¶K, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. MMMM,
§3, is amended to read:
K. Any balance remaining in the Drinking Water Enforcement program, General Fund
account at the end of any fiscal year to be carried forward for use by this program in
the next fiscal year for the same purpose.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §1591, sub-§2, ¶L is enacted to read:
L. Any balance remaining in the accounts of the Department of Health and Human
Services appropriated for the purpose of supplementing grants to the department under
the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered by the United States
Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims of Crime
pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984 at the end of any fiscal year to be
carried forward for use in the next fiscal year for the same purpose.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding to replace current and anticipated reductions in grants
to the department under the federal victim assistance formula grant program administered
by the United States Department of Justice, Office of Justice Programs, Office for Victims
of Crime pursuant to the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $6,000,000 $6,000,000
__________ __________
Page 1 - 132LR0973(01)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $6,000,000 $6,000,000
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.